North Carolina, session 2025, HB1202.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Community
Colleges System Office the sum of six million one hundred thousand dollars ($6,100,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated to Forsyth Technical Community
College (Forsyth Tech) to be used to establish a law enforcement driving training center in King,
North Carolina, in partnership with the City of Winston-Salem. The center shall include a driving
pad, roadway, and instructional building to be used as part of Forsyth Tech's Basic Law
Enforcement Training and continuing education programs.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*H1202-v-1*